Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201381-8,120
Land surveying; nonresident; registration;
fee; service of process.

A nonresident of this state who
is registered as a land surveyor in another state may be registered under
sections 81-8,108 to 81-8,127 by filing an application with the secretary
of the examining board and making payment to the examining board of a fee
in the sum of not less than twenty-five dollars and not more than one hundred
fifty dollars as set forth in the rules or bylaws. The
applicant shall be required to take such examinations as the examining
board deems necessary to determine his or her qualifications, but in any event
he or she shall be required to pass an examination
of not less than four hours' duration which shall include questions on laws,
procedures, and practices pertaining to the practice of land surveying in
this state. Before a nonresident of this state is registered under sections
81-8,108 to 81-8,127, he or she shall first file a written consent that actions
and suits at law may be commenced against him or her in any county of this
state in which any cause of action may arise because of any survey commenced
or conducted by such nonresident surveyor or his or her agent or employees
in such county.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 13, p. 1336;

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 23;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 97;

Laws 1985, LB 564, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 19;

Laws 2013, LB303, § 4.